src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-n3-norm_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - tekijä; sublexica n3_äö: # GOLD
    tekijä+N+Sg+Nom: tekijä
    tekijä+N+Sg+Gen: tekijän
    tekijä+N+Sg+Par: tekijää
    tekijä+N+Sg+Tra: tekijäksi
    tekijä+N+Sg+Abe: tekijättä
    tekijä+N+Sg+Ine: tekijässä
    tekijä+N+Sg+Ela: tekijästä
    tekijä+N+Sg+Ill: [tekijhään, tekihjään]
    tekijä+N+Sg+Ade: tekijällä
    tekijä+N+Sg+Abl: tekijältä
    tekijä+N+Sg+All: tekijälle
    tekijä+N+Sg+Ess: tekijännä
    tekijä+N+Pl+Nom: tekijät
    tekijä+N+Pl+Gen: tekijöitten
    tekijä+N+Pl+Par: tekijöitä
    tekijä+N+Pl+Tra: tekijöiksi
    tekijä+N+Pl+Abe: tekijöittä
    tekijä+N+Pl+Ine: tekijöissä
    tekijä+N+Pl+Ela: tekijöistä
    tekijä+N+Pl+Ill: tekijöihin
    tekijä+N+Pl+Ade: tekijöilä
    tekijä+N+Pl+Abl: tekijöiltä
    tekijä+N+Pl+All: tekijöile
    tekijä+N+Pl+Ess: tekijöinä
